Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7894.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 16 of the General Laws entitled "EDUCATION" is hereby amended by
adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 117
ACCESS FOR CONGRESSIONALLY CHARTERED YOUTH DEVELOPMENT
ORGANIZATION
16-117-1. Definitions.
For purposes of this section:
(1) "Youth organization" means a national youth development organization chartered by
Congress and listed in the following sections of Title 36 of the United States Code: §§30901("Boy
Scouts of America"), 31101("Boys and Girls Clubs of America"), and 80301 ("Girl Scouts of the
United States of America"); and which:
(i) Serves young people under twenty-one (21) years of age; and
(ii) Has an educational mission that develops life skills, leadership, workforce readiness,
physical fitness and promotes community service, civic engagement, and patriotism.
16-117-2. Access to schools.
Upon request of a youth organization, each public school district and each public charter
school shall provide:
(1) Annual recruitment opportunity. At least one opportunity per school year for

representatives of the youth organization to provide displays, brochures, flyers, on school property
and the use of other existing digital communication channels for the purpose of student recruitment.
(2) Classroom presentation. A scheduled date and time allowing representatives of the
youth organization to speak with students for up to ten (10) consecutive minutes during classroom
time and provide informational materials; provided that:
(i) The presentation does not occur during instruction in a core curriculum subject; and
(ii) School operations and instructional time are not materially disrupted.
(3) Parent/guardian notification. Advance notice to parents or guardians describing:
(i) The scheduled presentation; and
(ii) The right of any parent or guardian to withhold consent for their child’s participation.
16-117-3. Equal access not required for non-qualifying groups.
A school district or charter school shall not be required to provide the access described in
§ 16-117-2 to any entity not meeting the definition of a youth organization under § 16-117-1.
16-117-4. Construction.
Nothing in this section shall be construed to:
(1) Interfere with school safety policies;
(2) Authorize youth organizations to conduct activities inconsistent with school rules; or
(3) Limit the authority of school administrators to maintain order or discipline.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005058/SUB A
========
LC005058/SUB A - Page 2 of 3